Wyoming, session 2025, HB0303.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-39-124 and 9-14-204 are created to
read:

1-39-124. Liability; enforcement of federal
regulation of firearms, firearm accessories, magazines and
ammunition.
HB0303

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0433

A governmental entity is liable for damages resulting from
a violation of W.S. 9-14-203(a) pursuant to W.S. 9-14-204.

9-14-204. Civil actions permitted; remedies.

(a) Any governmental entity as defined in W.S.
1-39-103(a)(i), agency of the state, local government as
defined in W.S. 1-39-103(a)(ii) or law enforcement agency
that employs any public officer as defined in W.S.
6-5-101(a)(v) or peace officer as defined in W.S.
7-2-101(a)(iv) which officer knowingly violates W.S.
9-14-203(a) while acting within the scope of the officer's
employment shall be liable to an injured party for damages
resulting from the public officer's or peace officer's
conduct in a civil action before a court of competent
jurisdiction. The court, upon a finding of a violation and
in addition to any damages ordered under the Wyoming
Governmental Claims Act, may impose a civil penalty against
the governmental entity, agency or local government in an
amount not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00)
per violation and may order any injunctive or other relief
HB0303

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0433
permitted by law and payment of reasonable attorney fees
and costs to the injured party.

(b) Sovereign immunity shall not be an affirmative
defense in any action under this section.

Section 2. W.S. 1-39-103(a)(ix), 1-39-104(a) and
9-14-203(b) and (c) are amended to read:

1-39-103. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(ix) "This act" means W.S. 1-39-101 through
1-39-120 1-39-124.

1-39-104. Granting immunity from tort liability;
liability on contracts; exceptions.

(a) A governmental entity and its public employees
while acting within the scope of duties are granted
immunity from liability for any tort except as provided by
W.S. 1-39-105 through 1-39-112, and 1‑39‑122 and 1-39-123
HB0303

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0433
through 1-39-124. Any immunity in actions based on a
contract entered into by a governmental entity is waived
except to the extent provided by the contract if the
contract was within the powers granted to the entity and
was properly executed and except as provided in W.S.
1-39-120(b). The claims procedures of W.S. 1-39-113 apply
to contractual claims against governmental entities.

9-14-203. Prohibiting the enforcement of federal
regulation of firearms, firearm accessories, magazines and
ammunition; penalties; defense of Wyoming citizens.

(b) Nothing in this act shall limit or restrict a
public officer, as defined in W.S. 6-5-101(a)(v), or a
peace officer, as defined in W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv), from
providing assistance to federal authorities for purposes
not specifically identified in subsection (a) of this
section. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
prohibit Wyoming governmental entities from accepting
federal funds for law enforcement purposes.

(c) Any public officer, as defined in W.S.
6-5-101(a)(v), or peace officer, as defined in W.S.
HB0303

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0433
7-2-101(a)(iv), who knowingly violates subsection (a) of
this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by
imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not
more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), or both.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0303